Louisiana, session 2026, HB1134.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:557.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§557.1. Back-Deferred Retirement Option Program
A. There is hereby created an optional retirement benefit program for
members of the system called the "Back Deferred Retirement Option Program to
Reduce Expenditure by the Early Retirement of Abolished Judgeships" which shall
be referred to in this Section as "Back-DROP". This option shall apply only to each
judge who is otherwise eligible for retirement under this Subpart, who holds a
judgeship designated to be abolished by law upon the retirement of the judge, who
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1134 ENROLLED
voluntarily retires earlier than the expiration of his existing term in order to create
significant savings for the state through early termination of the judgeship, and does
not seek election to another judicial office.
B. In lieu of receiving a retirement benefit pursuant to this Subpart, an active
contributing member eligible pursuant to Subsection A of this Section with more
years of service than are required for service retirement and which are sufficient to
qualify for the Back-DROP period selected may make an irrevocable election at the
time of retirement to receive a Back-DROP benefit. A member may qualify for
Back-DROP only once. A member who has participated in the Deferred Retirement
Option Plan shall not be eligible to enroll in the Back-DROP.
C. At the time of retirement, the member shall select a Back-DROP period
to be specified in whole months. The Back-DROP period shall not exceed the lesser
of:
(1) Thirty-six months.
(2) The number of months of creditable service accrued after the member
first became eligible for regular retirement.
(3) The number of months remaining on the member's current unexpired
elected term of office.
D. Employer and employee contributions received by the retirement system
during the Back-DROP period and any interest that has accrued on employer and
employee contributions received during the period shall remain with the retirement
system and shall not be refunded to the member or employer.
E. The member's Back-DROP monthly benefit accrual shall be calculated
based on the provisions otherwise applicable for retirement under this Subpart
subject to the following conditions:
(1) For purposes of this Subsection, creditable service shall not include
service credit reciprocally recognized under R.S. 11:142.
(2) Accrued service at retirement, utilized for the purpose of calculating the
Back-DROP monthly benefit, shall be reduced by the Back-DROP period. The
regular retirement benefit shall be calculated in the same manner and shall be subject
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1134 ENROLLED
to the same survivor or beneficiary elections, as for any benefit due under this
Subpart except that the service credit equal to the months of the Back-DROP election
shall be excluded for the member's accrued service credit. The benefit due as elected
under this Section shall be payable monthly in the same manner as a benefit
otherwise due under this Subpart.
(3) Additional employer contributions shall be due from the member's
employing court equal to the number of months selected for the Back-DROP benefit
at the final salary applied to the contribution rate at the time of retirement and paid
at the time of retirement.
(4) In addition to the regular monthly retirement due under this Section, the
member shall be paid a lump-sum benefit equal to the Back-DROP maximum
monthly retirement benefit multiplied by the number of months selected as the Back-
DROP period.
F. In addition to the other limitations of this Section, any election pursuant
to this Section shall be made on or before June 30, 2027.
Section 2. To promote significant savings to the state general fund through early
termination of judgeships, any judge holding office on the effective date of this Act whose
judicial division or judgeship is designated to be abolished by law in the event of retirement
or resignation of the judge and who exercises an irrevocable option to retire under the
provisions of this Act prior to December 31, 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.
11:557.1 as enacted by this Act to the contrary, shall be allowed to immediately retire
regardless of his age and years of service, provided that such judge does not seek election
to any judicial office following retirement. The judge shall receive a maximum annual
benefit based on the member's service credit and final average compensation calculated as
if the member were eligible for regular service retirement. For any judge whose division of
court is specified to be abolished by operation of law only if they made an irrevocable
declaration that they will not seek re-election, the judge shall be deemed to also be subject
to the provisions of this Section if that declaration is made prior to July 1, 2026, and their
retirement is designated to occur pursuant to the provisions of this Act on or before
December 31, 2026.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1134 ENROLLED
Section 3. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.